Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.055

Change of registered agent.

A corporation may change its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430.

Any registered agent of a corporation may resign as agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4108; 2011 c 336 s 661; 1993 c 356 s 16; 1982 c 35 s 126; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.